Utah statutes.
78B-13-204.   Temporary emergency jurisdiction.

(1)  A court of this state has temporary emergency jurisdiction if the child is present in this state and the child has been abandoned or it is necessary in an emergency to protect the child because the child, or a sibling or parent of the child, is subjected to or threatened with mistreatment or abuse.

(2)  If there is no previous child custody determination that is entitled to be enforced under this chapter, and if no child custody proceeding has been commenced in a court of a state having jurisdiction under Sections 78B-13-201 through 78B-13-203, a child custody determination made under this section remains in effect until an order is obtained from a court of a state having jurisdiction under Sections 78B-13-201 through 78B-13-203.  If a child custody proceeding has not been or is not commenced in a court of a state having jurisdiction under Sections 78B-13-201 through 78B-13-203, a child custody determination made under this section becomes a final determination, if:

(a)  it so provides; and

(b)  this state becomes the home state of the child.

(3)  If there is a previous child custody determination that is entitled to be enforced under this chapter, or a child custody proceeding has been commenced in a court of a state having jurisdiction under Sections 78B-13-201 through 78B-13-203, any order issued by a court of this state under this section shall specify in the order a period of time which the court considers adequate to allow the person seeking an order to obtain an order from the state having jurisdiction under Sections 78B-13-201 through 78B-13-203.  The order issued in this state remains in effect until an order is obtained from the other state within the period specified or the period expires.

(4)  A court of this state that has been asked to make a child custody determination under this section, upon being informed that a child custody proceeding has been commenced, or a child custody determination has been made, by a court of a state having jurisdiction under Sections 78B-13-201 through 78B-13-203, shall immediately communicate with the other court.  A court of this state that is exercising jurisdiction pursuant to Sections 78B-13-201 through 78B-13-203, upon being informed that a child custody proceeding has been commenced, or a child custody determination has been made by a court of another state under a statute similar to this section shall immediately communicate with the court of that state.  The purpose of the communication is to resolve the emergency, protect the safety of the parties and the child, and determine a period for the duration of the temporary order.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

